Wyoming, session 2026, HB0026.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 31-2-207 and 31-3-101(g)(i) are
amended to read:
31-2-207. Publicly owned vehicles.
Upon application the department shall issue distinctive
license plates indicating public ownership for vehicles
owned by the United States, state of Wyoming, a county,
city, town or political subdivision of Wyoming, the tribal
governments of the Eastern Shoshone and Northern Arapaho
tribes of the Wind River Indian Reservation or a joint
powers board under W.S. 16-1-101 through 16-1-109. A
distinctive license plate under this section may be issued
to any public entity specified in this section, provided
that the public entity or another public entity specified
in this section owns the vehicle and the public entity
applying for the distinctive license plate has the
authority to possess and operate the vehicle in fulfillment
of its public purpose. Upon presentation of proper
credentials and identification of the applicant the
department shall issue license plates not disclosing public
ownership of a vehicle to investigative agencies of Wyoming
and the criminal investigative agencies of the department
of justice, department of defense and department of the
treasury of the United States and the records of the
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0026
ENROLLED ACT NO. 9, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
department shall not disclose the public ownership of the
vehicles.
31-3-101. Registration fees; exemptions.
(g) Owners of the following vehicles are exempt from
the payment of fees provided by subsections (a) and (b) of
this section:
(i) Vehicles owned by:
(A) The United States, state of Wyoming,
county, city, town or political subdivision of Wyoming or a
joint powers board created under W.S. 16-1-101 through
16-1-109;, or
(B) Vehicles owned by an irrigation
district created under W.S. 41-7-201 through 41-7-210; or
(C) Vehicles owned by a weed and pest
control district created under W.S. 11-5-101 et seq.
provided the vehicles are essential to the operation and
maintenance of the district and are used for no business or
commercial activity unrelated to the operation and
maintenance of the district;, or
(D) Vehicles owned by a senior citizen
center that is providing services to senior citizens under
W.S. 18-2-105;
(E) Vehicles owned by the tribal
governments of the Eastern Shoshone and Northern Arapaho
tribes of the Wind River Indian Reservation.
2

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0026
ENROLLED ACT NO. 9, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2026 BUDGET SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
3